Massachusetts, session 194th, S2144.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Chapter 6 of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting after section 15LLLLLL
the following section:-
Section 15MMMMMM. The governor shall annually issue a proclamation setting apart
October 25 as National Dwarfism Day and shall recommend that the day be observed in an
appropriate manner by the people.
of 1